Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1066.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 33(a) introductory paragraph of the act of December 20, 1985 (P.L.457, No.112), known as the Medical Practice Act of 1985, is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 33. Temporary license.(a) General rule.--[A] Except as provided under subsection (d), a temporary license empowers the licensee to:* * *(d) Exception.--The board shall grant a full and unrestricted license to practice medicine to a temporary 123456789101112131415161718192021 licensee not subject to subsection (a) who is a graduate from an international medical school, performed the duties of a physician for at least three years outside of the United States and demonstrates all of the following:(1) C ompetency as determined by the board. (2) Good standing with the board two years after the date of issuance of a temporary license from the board.(3) Sufficient evidence that the temporary licensee has an offer of employment as a physician at a health care facility that operates in this Commonwealth.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1066PN1167 - 2 - 1234567891011